Washington statutes.
RCW 11.135.060

Electronic documents and signatures recognized.

(1) A nontestamentary estate planning document or a signature on a nontestamentary estate planning document may not be denied legal effect or enforceability solely because it is in electronic form.

(2) If other law of this state requires a nontestamentary estate planning document to be in writing, an electronic record of the document satisfies the requirement.

(3) If other law of this state requires a signature on a nontestamentary estate planning document, an electronic signature satisfies the requirement.

(4) A person that refuses in violation of this section to accept a nontestamentary estate planning document or a signature on a nontestamentary estate planning document is subject to:

(a) A court order mandating acceptance of the document or signature; and

(b) Liability for reasonable attorneys' fees and costs incurred in any action or proceeding that confirms the validity of the document or signature or mandates acceptance of the document or signature.

[ 2024 c 188 s 7.]